Washington statutes.
RCW 36.56.080

Collective bargaining units or agreements.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until any such agreement has expired or until any such bargaining unit has been modified as provided by law.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 277 s 8.]